Maryland, session 2026, SB0341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–321.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM”
MEANS A MOVABLE PHOTOVOLTAIC SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION DEVICE THAT IS:
(1) DESIGNED TO BE CONNECTED TO A BUILDING’S ELECTRICAL
SYSTEM THROUGH A STANDARD ELECTRICAL OUTLET;
(2) PRIMARILY INTENDED TO OFFSET PART OF THE BUILDING’S
ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION;
(3) LIMITED TO SUPPLYING A MAXIMUM POWER OUTPUT OF NOT
MORE THAN 1,200 WATTS BACK TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM; AND
(4) CERTIFIED BY UNDERWRITERS LABORATORY OR AN EQUIVALENT
NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED TESTING LABORATORY.
(B) A PERSON MAY PURCHASE AND INSTALL A PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM FOR RESIDENTIAL USE ONLY.
(C) A PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM:
(1) IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF §§ 7–306 AND 7–306.1
OF THIS TITLE;

SENATE BILL 341 3
(2) IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN MEETING THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD; AND
(3) MAY NOT GENERATE RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS OF ANY TYPE.
(D) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY:
(1) MAY NOT REQUIRE A CUSTOMER USING A PORTABLE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM TO:
(I) OBTAIN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S APPROVAL BEFORE
INSTALLING OR USING THE PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM;
(II) PAY ANY FEE OR CHARGE RELATED TO THE PORTABLE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM’S ABILITY TO FEED ELECTRICITY BACK INTO
THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM; OR
(III) INSTALL ANY ADDITIONAL CONTROLS OR EQUIPMENT
BEYOND WHAT IS INTEGRATED INTO THE PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM; AND
(2) IS NOT LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGE CAUSED BY A PORTABLE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM.
7–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(L–1) “QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM”
MEANS A SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM THAT:
(1) HAS A GENERATING CAPACITY OF 5 MEGAWATTS OR LESS, AS
MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE SYSTEM’S INVERTER;
AND
(2) IS CERTIFIED TO GENERATE SREC–II CREDITS.
(L–2) “QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM”
MEANS A SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM THAT:
(1) HAS A GENERATING CAPACITY THAT IS GREATER THAN 5
MEGAWATTS, AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE
SYSTEM’S INVERTER; AND

SENATE BILL 341
(2) IS CERTIFIED TO GENERATE SREC–II CREDITS.
(P–2) “SOLAR RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT” OR “SREC” MEANS A
RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT THAT IS DERIVED FROM A SOLAR ENERGY TIER 1
RENEWABLE SOURCE THAT:
(1) IS CONNECTED TO THE DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM IN THE STATE; AND
(2) IS NOT CERTIFIED TO RECEIVE SREC–II CREDITS.
(P–3) “SOLAR RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT II” OR “SREC–II” MEANS A
SOLAR RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT EQUAL TO THE GENERATION ATTRIBUTES OF 1
MEGAWATT–HOUR OF ELECTRICITY CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION
OR DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM SERVING THE STATE AND DERIVED FROM:
(1) A QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM; OR
(2) A QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM.
7–703.
(a) (1) (i) The Commission shall implement a renewable energy portfolio
standard that, except as provided under paragraphs [(2) and (3)] (2), (3), AND (4) of this
subsection, applies to all retail electricity sales in the State by electricity suppliers.
(ii) If the standard becomes applicable to electricity sold to a
customer after the start of a calendar year, the standard does not apply to electricity sold
to the customer during that portion of the year before the standard became applicable.
(2) A renewable energy portfolio standard may not apply to electricity sales
at retail by any electricity supplier:
(i) in excess of 300,000,000 kilowatt–hours of industrial process load
to a single customer in a year;
(ii) to residential customers in a region of the State in which
electricity prices for residential customers are subject to a freeze or cap contained in a
settlement agreement entered into under § 7–505 of this title until the freeze or cap has
expired; or
(iii) to a customer served by an electric cooperative under an
electricity supplier purchase agreement that existed on October 1, 2004, until the

SENATE BILL 341 5
expiration of the agreement, as the agreement may be renewed or amended.
(3) The portion of a renewable energy portfolio standard that represents
offshore wind energy:
(i) applies only to the distribution sales of electric companies; and
(ii) may not apply to distribution sales by any electric company in
excess of:
1. 75,000,000 kilowatt–hours of industrial process load to a
single customer in a year; and
2. 3,000 kilowatt–hours of electricity in a month to a
customer who is an owner of agricultural land and files an Internal Revenue Service form
1040, schedule F.
(4) THE PORTION OF A RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD
THAT REPRESENTS SOLAR ENERGY THAT IS DERIVED FROM QUALIFYING
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS AND QUALIFYING
UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS APPLIES ONLY TO THE
DISTRIBUTION SALES OF ELECTRIC COMPANIES.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, the renewable
energy portfolio standard shall be as follows:
(23) in 2028:
(i) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE SUM OF:
1. 43% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
[1.] A. at least 11% derived from solar energy THAT IS NOT
GENERATED FROM SOURCES IDENTIFIED IN ITEM 2 OF THIS ITEM;
[2.] B. an amount set by the Commission under §
7–704.2(a) of this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800
megawatts of Round 2 offshore wind projects; and
[3.] C. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–709.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS DERIVED FROM
SOLAR ENERGY THAT IS GENERATED FROM QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS AND QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY

SENATE BILL 341
GENERATING SYSTEMS; AND
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(24) in 2029:
(i) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE SUM OF:
1. 49.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
[1.] A. at least 12.5% derived from solar energy THAT IS
NOT GENERATED FROM SOURCES IDENTIFIED IN ITEM 2 OF THIS ITEM;
[2.] B. an amount set by the Commission under §
7–704.2(a) of this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800
megawatts of Round 2 offshore wind projects; and
[3.] C. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §
7–709.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS DERIVED FROM
SOLAR ENERGY THAT IS GENERATED FROM QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS AND QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS; AND
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(25) in 2030 and later:
(i) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE SUM OF:
1. 50% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
[1.] A. at least 14.5% derived from solar energy THAT IS
NOT GENERATED FROM SOURCES IDENTIFIED IN ITEM 2 OF THIS ITEM;
[2.] B. an amount set by the Commission under §
7–704.2(a) of this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 1,200
megawatts of Round 2 offshore wind projects; and
[3.] C. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
2. AN AMOUNT SET BY THE COMMISSION UNDER §

SENATE BILL 341 7
7–709.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS DERIVED FROM
SOLAR ENERGY THAT IS GENERATED FROM QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS AND QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS; AND
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources.
(e) (1) (I) The required percentage of an electric cooperative’s renewable
energy portfolio standard derived from solar energy shall be 2.5% in 2020 and later.
(II) AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE MAY MEET ITS RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD FOR SOLAR ENERGY BY AUTHORIZING THE
PURCHASE OF SREC–IIS THROUGH A PROCUREMENT PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY
THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBTITLE 12, PART V OF THIS TITLE.
(III) AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE THAT AUTHORIZES THE
PURCHASE OF SREC–IIS THROUGH A PROCUREMENT PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY
THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBTITLE 12, PART V OF THIS TITLE MAY NOT RESCIND
THAT AUTHORIZATION.
(IV) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028, AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE
THAT FAILS TO SATISFY ITS SOLAR ENERGY REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL PAY A COMPLIANCE FEE EQUAL TO THE WEIGHTED AVERAGE
DOLLAR PER KILOWATT–HOUR OF SREC–II CREDITS PROCURED UNDER SUBTITLE
12, PART V OF THIS TITLE FOR THE RELEVANT COMPLIANCE YEAR INSTEAD OF THE
COMPLIANCE FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) (I) The required percentage of a municipal electric utility’s
renewable energy portfolio standard shall be[:
(i) in 2021:
1. 20.4% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
A. at least 1.95% derived from solar energy; and
B. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy; and
2. 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(ii) in 2022 and later,] 20.4% from Tier 1 renewable sources,
including:
1. at least 1.95% derived from solar energy; and

SENATE BILL 341
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy.
(II) A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC UTILITY MAY MEET ITS
RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD FOR SOLAR ENERGY BY AUTHORIZING
THE PURCHASE OF SREC–IIS THROUGH A PROCUREMENT PROCESS ESTABLISHED
BY THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBTITLE 12, PART V OF THIS TITLE.
(III) A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC UTILITY THAT AUTHORIZES THE
PURCHASE OF SREC–IIS THROUGH A PROCUREMENT PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY
THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBTITLE 12, PART V OF THIS TITLE MAY NOT RESCIND
THAT AUTHORIZATION.
(IV) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028, A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC
UTILITY THAT FAILS TO SATISFY ITS SOLAR ENERGY REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL PAY A COMPLIANCE FEE EQUAL TO THE WEIGHTED AVERAGE
DOLLAR PER KILOWATT–HOUR OF SREC–II CREDITS PROCURED UNDER SUBTITLE
12, PART V OF THIS TITLE FOR THE RELEVANT COMPLIANCE YEAR INSTEAD OF THE
COMPLIANCE FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–705.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each electricity
supplier shall submit a report to the Commission each year in a form and by a date specified
by the Commission that:
(i) 1. demonstrates that the electricity supplier has complied
with the applicable renewable energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle and
includes the submission of the required amount of renewable energy credits; or
2. demonstrates the amount of electricity sales by which the
electricity supplier failed to meet the applicable renewable energy portfolio standard;
(ii) documents the level of participation of minority business
enterprises and minorities in the activities that support the creation of renewable energy
credits used to satisfy the standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle, including development,
installation, and operation of generating facilities that create credits;
(iii) documents the amounts and types of generation associated with
renewable energy credits purchased in compliance with § 7–707(c) of this subtitle during
the reporting period; and
(iv) documents the amount of renewable energy certificates that do
not qualify as renewable energy credits as defined in § 7–701 of this subtitle, including, for
each certificate:

SENATE BILL 341 9
1. the energy source associated with the certificate, including
its location, when it was constructed, and which electric distribution system received the
energy;
2. whether the purchase of the certificate was bundled with
a power purchase agreement from the energy source associated with the certificate;
3. whether the certificate was purchased directly from the
operator of the energy source or through a third party; and
4. any other information required by the Commission.
(2) Paragraph (1)(iii) and (iv) of this subsection does not apply to:
(i) the Department of General Services’ sale of energy under §
7–704.4 of this subtitle; or
(ii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this title.
(b) (1) This subsection does not apply to a shortfall from:
(I) the required Tier 1 renewable sources that is to be derived from
post–2022 geothermal systems; OR
(II) THE REQUIRED SOLAR ENERGY TIER 1 RENEWABLE
SOURCES THAT IS TO BE DERIVED FROM QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS AND QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS.
(2) [If] BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2026, IF an electricity supplier OR
ELECTRIC COMPANY fails to comply with ITS OBLIGATION UNDER the renewable energy
portfolio standard for the applicable year, the electricity supplier OR ELECTRIC COMPANY
shall pay into the [Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under §
9–20B–05 of the State Government Article] ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER §
7–1235 OF THIS TITLE:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph, a compliance fee
of:
1. the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall
from required Tier 1 renewable sources other than the shortfall from the required Tier 1
renewable sources that is to be derived from solar energy CONNECTED TO THE
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM IN THE STATE:
A. 4 cents through 2016;

SENATE BILL 341
B. 3.75 cents in 2017 and 2018;
C. 3 cents in 2019 through 2023;
D. 2.75 cents in 2024;
E. 2.5 cents in 2025;
F. 2.475 cents in 2026;
G. 2.45 cents in 2027;
H. 2.25 cents in 2028 and 2029; and
I. 2.235 cents in 2030 and later;
2. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from
required Tier 1 renewable sources that is to be derived from solar energy:
A. 45 cents in 2008;
B. 40 cents in 2009 through 2014;
C. 35 cents in 2015 and 2016;
D. 19.5 cents in 2017;
E. 17.5 cents in 2018;
F. 10 cents in 2019;
G. 10 cents in 2020;
H. 8 cents in 2021;
I. 6 cents in 2022;
J. 6 cents in 2023;
K. 6 cents in 2024;
L. 5.5 cents in 2025;
M. 4.5 cents in 2026;

SENATE BILL 341 11
N. 3.5 cents in 2027;
O. 3.25 cents in 2028;
P. 2.5 cents in 2029; and
Q. 2.25 cents in 2030 and later; and
3. 1.5 cents for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required
Tier 2 renewable sources; or
(ii) for industrial process load:
1. for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required Tier 1
renewable sources, a compliance fee of:
A. 0.8 cents in 2006, 2007, and 2008;
B. 0.5 cents in 2009 and 2010;
C. 0.4 cents in 2011 and 2012;
D. 0.3 cents in 2013 and 2014;
E. 0.25 cents in 2015 and 2016; and
F. except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, 0.2
cents in 2017 and later; and
2. nothing for any shortfall from required Tier 2 renewable
sources.
(3) For industrial process load, the compliance fee for each kilowatt–hour
of shortfall from required Tier 1 renewable sources is nothing for the year following any
year during which, after final calculations, the net rate impact per megawatt–hour from
Round 1 offshore wind projects exceeded $1.65 in 2012 dollars.
(b–1) If an electricity supplier fails to comply with the renewable energy portfolio
standard that is required to be derived from post–2022 geothermal systems for the
applicable year, the electricity supplier shall pay into the [Maryland Strategic Energy
Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05 of the State Government Article] ESCROW
ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–1235 OF THIS TITLE a compliance fee of the
following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required post–2022 geothermal
systems:
(1) 10 cents in 2023 through 2025;

SENATE BILL 341
(2) 9 cents in 2026;
(3) 8 cents in 2027; and
(4) 6.5 cents in 2028 and later.
7–709.2.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND BEFORE EACH
PROCUREMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–1232 OF THIS TITLE, THE COMMISSION
SHALL DETERMINE:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF SRECS AND SREC–IIS
GENERATED BY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS IN THE STATE DURING THE
PREVIOUS YEAR; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT OF ADDITIONAL SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION
NEEDED, IF ANY, TO MEET THE SOLAR PORTION OF THE RENEWABLE ENERGY
PORTFOLIO STANDARD FOR THE CURRENT YEAR.
(2) AFTER MAKING THE DETERMINATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO
PROCURE THE TOTAL NUMBER OF SRECS AND SREC–IIS GENERATED DURING
THAT COMPLIANCE YEAR ON A DATE, DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION, THAT IS
AFTER THE DATE OF THE LAST MONTH IN WHICH SRECS AND SREC–IIS ARE
ISSUED FOR THE FINAL MONTH OF THAT COMPLIANCE YEAR.
(3) EACH YEAR THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF THE ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED IN § 7–1235 OF THIS
TITLE, SHALL DETERMINE EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SREC AND SREC–II
OBLIGATION BASED ON THE TOTAL RETAIL ELECTRICITY SALES IN THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY DURING THE PREVIOUS YEAR.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE PROCUREMENT OF
SRECS AND SREC–IIS GENERATED BY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS
THAT BEGAN OPERATION BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AN ANNUAL PROCESS FOR
THE PROCUREMENT OF ALL AVAILABLE SRECS AND SREC–IIS FROM SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT BEGAN OPERATION BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028.
(3) THE PROCESS SHALL:
(I) DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF SRECS AND SREC–IIS

SENATE BILL 341 13
NEEDED TO BE PROCURED IN EACH PROCUREMENT;
(II) OCCUR FOLLOWING THE LAST MONTH IN WHICH SRECS
AND SREC–IIS ARE GENERATED FOR THAT YEAR; AND
(III) ENSURE THAT THE SRECS AND SREC–IIS PROCURED ARE
EQUAL TO THE TOTAL SRECS AND SREC–IIS GENERATED IN THAT YEAR.
(4) THE PRICE FOR AN SREC OR SREC–II PROCURED THROUGH THE
PROCESS REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE EQUAL TO
THE ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PAYMENT FOR SOLAR ENERGY UNDER § 7–705 OF
THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE RELEVANT RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD
COMPLIANCE YEAR.
7–1230. RESERVED.
7–1231. RESERVED.
PART V. SOLAR ENERGY.
7–1232.
(A) (1) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028, AND AT INTERVALS OF NOT MORE
THAN 18 MONTHS UNTIL JANUARY 1, 2036, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROGRAMS
ESTABLISHED IN §§ 7–1233 AND 7–1234 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION, BY
ORDER OR REGULATION, SHALL ISSUE A SOLICITATION FOR APPLICATIONS FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION OF SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS ELIGIBLE FOR
INCLUSION IN THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD THAT, IN TOTAL,
WILL INCREASE THE GENERATION OF SOLAR ENERGY IN THE STATE BY 4,000
MEGAWATTS OF GENERATING CAPACITY IN ADDITION TO THE TOTAL GENERATING
CAPACITY OF THE SOLAR GENERATING SYSTEMS IN OPERATION IN THE STATE ON
JANUARY 1, 2028, WITH THE ADDITIONAL GENERATION CAPACITY TO CONSIST OF:
(I) 2,000 MEGAWATTS FROM QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS; AND
(II) 2,000 MEGAWATTS FROM QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS.
(2) THE COMMISSION, BY ORDER OR REGULATION, SHALL ESTABLISH
A PROCESS BY WHICH THE NUMBER OF SRECS ELECTRIC COMPANIES MUST
PROCURE UNDER § 7–709.2 OF THIS TITLE MAY BE REDUCED:

SENATE BILL 341
(I) BY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE NUMBER OF SRECS
PROCURED DURING THE 2027 COMPLIANCE YEAR; AND
(II) BASED ON A METHOD DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) THE COMMISSION, BY ORDER OR REGULATION, SHALL ESTABLISH A
PROCESS TO ADJUST THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD FOR SOLAR
ENERGY EACH YEAR TO ACCOUNT FOR THE PROJECTED NUMBER OF SRECS AND
SREC–IIS ANTICIPATED TO BE PROCURED UNDER § 7–709.2 OF THIS TITLE, AND
ANY OTHER ADJUSTMENTS THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
(C) THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF
INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS OR EXPERTS IN THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS PART.
(D) A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A LIABILITY OF ANY SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS CONSTRUCTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE
CONSIDERED A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A LIABILITY OF THE STATE.
7–1233.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED INCENTIVE” MEANS THE
MONETARY VALUE OF AN SREC–II GENERATED BY A QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(3) “CAPACITY BLOCK” MEANS THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF
GENERATING CAPACITY, MEASURED IN MEGAWATTS OF ALTERNATING CURRENT,
THAT THE COMMISSION DETERMINES MAY BE ALLOTTED TO A SPECIFIC MARKET
SEGMENT FOR ANY GIVEN INCENTIVE YEAR.
(4) “COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 7–306.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(5) “ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–306 OF THIS TITLE.
(6) “MARKET SEGMENT” MEANS THE GROUP CLASSIFICATION FOR
QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS UNDER THE
PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 341 15
(7) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE DISTRIBUTED SOLAR FACILITIES
INCENTIVE PROGRAM.
(8) “PROJECT OFF–TAKER” MEANS THE END USER OF SREC–IIS
THAT ARE GENERATED BY A QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM.
(9) “QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–701(L–1) OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS A DISTRIBUTED SOLAR FACILITIES INCENTIVE
PROGRAM.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
7–1232, THE PROGRAM SHALL BEGIN ACCEPTING APPLICATIONS FROM QUALIFYING
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS WITHIN A CAPACITY BLOCK ON
A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS.
(C) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2035, THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE
INCENTIVES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF NEW GENERATION CAPACITY OF AT LEAST
2,000 MEGAWATTS OF SOLAR ENERGY FROM OWNERS OF QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS.
(D) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA AND
AN APPLICATION PROCESS FOR OWNERS OF DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS TO BE QUALIFIED UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION, A QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) BE CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM
SERVING MARYLAND;
(II) BE ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN THE RENEWABLE ENERGY
PORTFOLIO STANDARD;
(III) BE PLACED IN SERVICE AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2027; AND
(IV) CONTRIBUTE TOWARD THE STATE’S ENERGY SUPPLY
NEEDS.

SENATE BILL 341
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EVERY 3 YEARS
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AN ADMINISTRATIVELY
DETERMINED INCENTIVE AND ANNUAL CAPACITY BLOCK FOR EACH OF THE
FOLLOWING MARKET SEGMENTS UNDER THE PROGRAM:
(I) BEHIND–THE–METER RESIDENTIAL;
(II) BEHIND–THE–METER NONRESIDENTIAL;
(III) COMMUNITY SOLAR; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER MARKET SEGMENT DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY ADJUST THE ADMINISTRATIVELY
DETERMINED INCENTIVE AND CAPACITY BLOCKS NOT EARLIER THAN 90 DAYS
AFTER PROVIDING PUBLIC NOTICE OF THE ACTION:
(I) IF THE COMMISSION FINDS THAT AN ADJUSTMENT IS
NECESSARY; OR
(II) TO ADDRESS CHANGES IN LAW OR POLICY.
(3) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY REVIEW AND ADJUST THE ADMINISTRATIVELY
DETERMINED INCENTIVE WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER MISSING A CAPACITY BLOCK.
(4) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPHS (1) THROUGH (3)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED INCENTIVE FOR A
QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM SHALL BE FIXED
FOR A PERIOD OF 15 YEARS AT THE AMOUNT THAT WAS ESTABLISHED FOR THE
CAPACITY BLOCK IN THE YEAR THAT THE QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM APPLIED FOR THE CAPACITY BLOCK.
(5) (I) IN ESTABLISHING THE ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED
INCENTIVE AND ANNUAL CAPACITY BLOCK UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE
COMMISSION SHALL BALANCE THE NEED FOR CONTINUED MARKET DEVELOPMENT
FOR EACH MARKET SEGMENT WHILE LIMITING THE NET RESIDENTIAL RATEPAYER
COST TO NOT MORE THAN 5% OF THE AVERAGE ANNUAL ELECTRIC BILL OVER THE
DURATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(II) IN CALCULATING THE NET RESIDENTIAL RATEPAYER COST,

SENATE BILL 341 17
THE COMMISSION SHALL TAKE INTO ACCOUNT:
1. THE COST OF ANY ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED
INCENTIVE SREC–IIS REQUIRED TO BE PURCHASED BY ELECTRIC COMPANIES; AND
2. THE BENEFITS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE PROGRAM, AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION, INCLUDING:
A. ENERGY GENERATED;
B. THE VALUE OF ANY REDUCTION IN CAPACITY
PURCHASES BY LOAD–SERVING ENTITIES IN THE STATE THAT RESULT FROM THE
QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS AUTHORIZED
UNDER THE PROGRAM;
C. AVOIDED TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION LINE
AND CAPACITY AUCTION COSTS; AND
D. SOCIETAL COSTS AND BENEFITS.
(F) IN DETERMINING THE ADMINISTRATIVELY DETERMINED INCENTIVE
FOR EACH MARKET SEGMENT, THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY CONSIDER PRICE DIFFERENTIALS BASED ON:
(I) FEDERAL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS RELATING TO SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS;
(II) THE COST TO CONSTRUCT AND FINANCE A SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM; AND
(III) ANY OTHER CRITERIA DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
(2) SHALL ESTABLISH MONETARY VALUES THAT ENCOURAGE
MARKET DEVELOPMENT WHILE BALANCING RATEPAYER COSTS; AND
(3) SHALL STRIVE TO ACHIEVE MARKET DIVERSITY.
(G) IN ESTABLISHING THE CAPACITY BLOCK FOR EACH MARKET SEGMENT
UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) ENABLE MEANINGFUL AND CONTINUED MARKET GROWTH FOR
EACH MARKET SEGMENT;

SENATE BILL 341
(2) CONSIDER THE VALUE OF REDUCING ELECTRICITY DEMAND AND
THE COST OF INSTALLING GENERATION CAPACITY ON THE TRANSMISSION AND
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS; AND
(3) FOR EACH MARKET SEGMENT:
(I) ENSURE THAT THE NEXT CAPACITY BLOCK IS ESTABLISHED
AS SOON AS REASONABLY POSSIBLE AFTER THE CURRENT CAPACITY BLOCK IS
FULLY RESERVED; AND
(II) MAINTAIN A CAPACITY BLOCK WAITLIST UNTIL THE NEXT
CAPACITY BLOCK IS ESTABLISHED AND ALLOW THE WAITLISTED PROJECTS TO HAVE
PRIORITY IN THE SUBSEQUENT CAPACITY BLOCK.
(H) (1) A QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM THAT GENERATES SREC–IIS UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT RECEIVE ANY
OTHER EQUIVALENT SOLAR ENERGY CREDITS.
(2) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, THE
PROVISIONS OF § 7–703 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO ENERGY GENERATED BY A
QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
(3) AN SREC–II GENERATED BY A QUALIFYING DISTRIBUTED SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY BE INCLUDED IN
MEETING THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD ONLY FOR THE YEAR IN
WHICH THE SREC–II IS GENERATED OR THE FOLLOWING YEAR, AS DETERMINED BY
THE COMMISSION.
7–1234.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE UTILITY–SCALE SREC–II PROGRAM.
(3) “QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–701(L–2) OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS A UTILITY–SCALE SREC–II PROGRAM.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 341 19
(C) BY JANUARY 1, 2035, THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE INCENTIVES FOR
THE DEVELOPMENT OF AT LEAST 2,000 MEGAWATTS OF SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING CAPACITY BY QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS.
(D) A QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) HAVE A GENERATING CAPACITY THAT IS GREATER THAN 5
MEGAWATTS, AS MEASURED IN DIRECT CURRENT, OR ANOTHER GENERATING
CAPACITY AS SPECIFIED BY THE COMMISSION BUT AT LEAST 5 MEGAWATTS;
(2) BE CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM
SERVING MARYLAND;
(3) BE ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN THE RENEWABLE ENERGY
PORTFOLIO STANDARD;
(4) BE NEWLY CONSTRUCTED OR RECONSTRUCTED; AND
(5) MEET ANY OTHER CRITERIA DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSION.
(E) (1) BY REGULATION OR ORDER, THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH
A COMPETITIVE SOLICITATION PROCESS FOR THE SELECTION OF PROJECTS FOR
THE CONSTRUCTION OF QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEMS UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE SOLICITATION PROCESS SHALL REQUIRE THAT
APPLICATIONS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS INCLUDE:
(I) A PROPOSED SREC–II PRICING SCHEDULE THAT
SPECIFIES:
1. A FIXED RATE OR RATE SCHEDULE; AND
2. A FIXED PRICE FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL
ATTRIBUTES OF THE ENERGY GENERATED BY THE SYSTEM; AND
(II) A CERTIFICATION THAT, IF SELECTED UNDER THE
PROGRAM, THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM SHALL INCLUDE A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT

SENATE BILL 341
AS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–1232 OF THIS SUBTITLE, DETERMINE A
SCHEDULE FOR THE PROCUREMENT OF QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS UNDER THE PROGRAM THAT MEETS THE JANUARY
1, 2035, GOAL WHILE BALANCING RATEPAYER COSTS; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING
REQUIREMENTS FOR:
(I) CERTIFICATION AS A QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM; AND
(II) ANY MONEY TO BE HELD IN ESCROW DURING THE BIDDING
PROCESS.
(G) (1) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EVERY 18 MONTHS
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL COMMENCE SOLICITATIONS FOR THE
AWARD OF PROJECTS UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE SOLICITATION SHALL:
(I) AWARD CONTRACTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF
QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS FOR NOT LESS
THAN 205 MEGAWATTS PER YEAR FOR 8 YEARS AFTER THE FIRST CONTRACTS ARE
AWARDED;
(II) AWARD CONTRACTS WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER EACH
SOLICITATION;
(III) ENSURE AWARDED PROJECTS RECEIVE A RENEWABLE
ENERGY INCENTIVE PAYMENT, IN THE FORM OF AN SREC–II VALUE PER
MEGAWATT–HOUR FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTE PRODUCED BY THE
QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM, AND ANY OTHER
BENEFITS TO THE STATE PROVIDED BY THE SYSTEM, AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION;
(IV) ENSURE THAT THE LENGTH OF AN AWARD IS SUFFICIENT TO
ENCOURAGE LOW FINANCING RATES, PROVIDE REASONABLE RISKS TO
RATEPAYERS, AND ENABLE THE DEVELOPMENT OF AFFORDABLE RENEWABLE
ENERGY;

SENATE BILL 341 21
(V) MITIGATE PRICE AND DELIVERY RISKS FOR CONSUMERS;
(VI) INCLUDE REQUIREMENTS DESIGNED TO ENSURE
SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF PROJECTS, INCLUDING THE IMPOSITION OF
APPROPRIATE ESCROW FEES, BID MATURITY REQUIREMENTS, REQUIRED
INTERCONNECTION MILESTONES, AND COMMERCIAL OPERATION MILESTONES;
(VII) ENSURE THE RECOGNITION OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND
PUBLIC HEALTH BENEFITS OF PROJECTS LOCATED ON BROWNFIELDS OR
CONTAMINATED SITES;
(VIII) BE OPEN ON A NONDISCRIMINATORY BASIS TO ANY
PROJECT MEETING THE CRITERIA OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(IX) INCLUDE ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DEVELOPED BY THE
COMMISSION.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY:
(I) ESTABLISH CONFIDENTIAL HIGH– AND LOW–APPLICATION
THRESHOLDS BEFORE CONDUCTING A SOLICITATION, PROVIDED THAT THE
THRESHOLDS PROMOTE FISCAL RESPONSIBILITY AND ENSURE THE LIKELIHOOD OF
SUCCESSFUL PROJECTS, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
(II) MAY INCLUDE A CAP ON THE RENEWABLE ENERGY
INCENTIVE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(III) PROCURE MORE THAN THE MINIMUM QUANTITY OF SOLAR
ENERGY REQUIRED UNDER THE PROGRAM IF APPLICATIONS ARE BELOW THE
LOW–APPLICATION THRESHOLD ESTABLISHED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(4) BEFORE ISSUING A SOLICITATION FOR PROJECTS UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUEST THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRY TO DETERMINE THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE FOR EACH CLASSIFICATION
OF WORKER REQUIRED TO PERFORM WORK ON THE PROJECT IN ORDER TO INCLUDE
THAT DETERMINATION IN THE BIDDING PROCESS.
(5) THE COMMISSION, AT THE END OF THE SOLICITATION PROCESS,
SHALL:
(I) RANK ALL APPLICATIONS RECEIVED BASED ON THE
ESTIMATED COST OF THE PROJECT OR ESTIMATED COST BY CATEGORY;

SENATE BILL 341
(II) SELECT ONE OR MORE PROJECTS IN RANKED ORDER, UP TO
THE LIMIT ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION; AND
(III) ADJUST THE NUMBER OF PROJECTS SELECTED IF THE
COSTS ARE ABOVE OR BELOW THE CONFIDENTIAL PREDETERMINED THRESHOLDS
ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(H) (1) THE COMMISSION, BY ORDER, SHALL APPROVE, CONDITIONALLY
APPROVE, OR DENY ONE OR MORE PROJECTS UNDER THIS SECTION WITHIN 6
MONTHS AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE SOLICITATION PERIOD.
(2) AN ORDER APPROVING A PROJECT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(I) SPECIFY THE SREC–II FIXED PRICING SCHEDULE FOR
ENERGY GENERATED BY THE PROJECT;
(II) SPECIFY THE DURATION OF THE SREC–II FIXED PRICING
SCHEDULE, NOT TO EXCEED 15 YEARS;
(III) SPECIFY THE TOTAL NUMBER OF SREC–IIS THAT MAY BE
SOLD EACH YEAR FROM THE QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM;
(IV) PROVIDE THAT NO PAYMENT MAY BE MADE FOR AN
SREC–II UNTIL THE QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM IS OPERATIONAL AND GENERATING ENERGY; AND
(V) PROVIDE THAT THE STATE SHALL BE HELD HARMLESS FOR
ANY COST OVERRUNS ASSOCIATED WITH THE CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF
THE QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM.
(3) A PROJECT APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL REQUIRE:
(I) COMPLIANCE WITH THE APPLICABLE PREVAILING WAGE
RATES DETERMINED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF §§ 17–219
THROUGH 17–221 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(III) THE CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS TO INCLUDE
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION IN ANY CONTRACTS FOR ANY OTHER
SUBCONTRACTORS BELOW THE PRIME CONTRACTORS OR SUBCONTRACTORS.

SENATE BILL 341 23
(4) THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSIONER
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBSECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) PROVISIONS RELATING TO THE REPORTING OF
NONCOMPLIANCE OR VIOLATIONS OF THE PREVAILING WAGE REQUIREMENTS;
(II) PROVISIONS ALLOWING THE USAGE OF THE ESCROW
ACCOUNT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO ISSUE BACKPAY TO WORKERS; AND
(III) PROVISIONS ESTABLISHING LIQUIDATED DAMAGES
EQUIVALENT TO THE PROVISIONS IN §§ 17–220 AND 17–222 OF THE STATE FINANCE
AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(I) (1) UNDER THE PROGRAM, A QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM SHALL GENERATE ONLY SREC–IIS.
(2) A QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM THAT GENERATES SREC–IIS UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY NOT RECEIVE ANY
EQUIVALENT RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS OF ANY TYPE.
(3) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
PROVISIONS OF § 7–703 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO SREC–IIS GENERATED UNDER
THE PROGRAM.
(4) UNDER THE PROGRAM:
(I) AN SREC–II GENERATED BY A QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM MAY BE APPLIED ONLY TOWARD MEETING THE
RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD FOR THE YEAR IN WHICH THE
SREC–II IS GENERATED OR THE FOLLOWING YEAR, ON DETERMINATION BY THE
COMMISSION; AND
(II) AN OWNER OF A QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM PRODUCING SREC–IIS MAY NOT SELL, ALIENATE,
OR DISPOSE OF ANY OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTES ASSOCIATED WITH THE
ENERGY GENERATED BY THE SYSTEM.
(J) (1) AN APPLICATION FOR A QUALIFYING UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO A
COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT.

SENATE BILL 341
(2) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT SHALL:
(I) PROMOTE INCREASED OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL, SMALL,
MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESSES IN THE CLEAN
ENERGY INDUSTRY;
(II) ENSURE THE TIMELY, SAFE, AND EFFICIENT COMPLETION
OF THE PROJECT BY FACILITATING THE HIRING OF HIGHLY SKILLED WORKERS WHO
SHALL BE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE, AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(III) GUARANTEE THAT THE CONSTRUCTION WORK ASSOCIATED
WITH THE PROJECT IS SUBJECT TO AN AGREEMENT THAT:
1. ESTABLISHES THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT AT THE CONSTRUCTION SITE;
2. GUARANTEES AGAINST STRIKES, LOCKOUTS, OR
SIMILAR DISRUPTIONS;
3. ENSURES THAT ALL WORK PERFORMED ON THE
PROJECT CONFORMS TO ALL RELEVANT FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS, RULES, AND
REGULATIONS;
4. CREATES MUTUALLY BINDING PROCEDURES FOR
RESOLVING LABOR DISPUTES ARISING DURING THE TERM OF THE PROJECT;
5. SETS FORTH MECHANISMS FOR LABOR–MANAGEMENT
COOPERATION ON MATTERS OF MUTUAL INTEREST, INCLUDING PRODUCTIVITY,
QUALITY OF WORK, SAFETY, AND HEALTH; AND
6. BINDS ALL CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS TO
THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT THROUGH THE INCLUSION OF APPROPRIATE
PROVISIONS IN ALL RELEVANT SOLICITATION AND CONTRACT DOCUMENTS;
(IV) PROMOTE SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT BY
ENSURING THAT AT LEAST 80 PERCENT OF THE CRAFT WORKERS HAVE COMPLETED
AN OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH ADMINISTRATION’S 10–HOUR SAFETY
COURSE;
(V) PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES IN THE
CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRY FOR LOCAL RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN,

SENATE BILL 341 25
MINORITIES, AND FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS;
(VI) INCLUDE PROVISIONS FOR LOCAL HIRING AND HIRING
HISTORICALLY DISADVANTAGED INDIVIDUALS; AND
(VII) ENSURE A STEADY SUPPLY OF LABOR AND PROMOTE
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BY REQUIRING THE USE OF APPRENTICES ENROLLED
IN REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS, AS DEFINED IN TITLE 11, SUBTITLE
4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(K) ANY MISREPRESENTATION OR OMISSION INCLUDED IN THE REPORTING
REQUIRED BY A CONTRACT AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL CONSTITUTE A
FALSE RECORD OR STATEMENT MATERIAL TO A FALSE OR FRAUDULENT CLAIM FOR
PURPOSES OF § 8–102 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
7–1235.
(A) THE COMMISSION, BY REGULATION OR ORDER, SHALL:
(1) DIRECT ELECTRICITY SUPPLIERS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
COMMISSION, TO JOINTLY SELECT AN ESCROW ADMINISTRATOR;
(2) ESTABLISH AN ESCROW ACCOUNT, UNDER THE SUPERVISION OF
THE ESCROW ADMINISTRATOR, TO ENSURE THE SECURE AND TRANSPARENT
TRANSFER OF REVENUES AND SRECS, REGARDLESS OF TYPE, PROCURED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) ESTABLISH A NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE THAT ALLOWS AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY TO RECOVER ALL COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PURCHASE OF
SRECS AND SREC–IIS FROM CUSTOMERS IN THE SERVICE TERRITORY OF THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT IS ADDED TO THE SUPPLY RATE ON A CUSTOMER’S
UTILITY BILL; AND
(4) ESTABLISH A MECHANISM THAT ANNUALLY:
(I) DETERMINES EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SREC AND
SREC–II PURCHASE OBLIGATIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE FOLLOWING
COMPLIANCE YEAR FOR SRECS AND SREC–IIS GENERATED BY SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT BEGIN OPERATION AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028;
(II) ADJUSTS THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD
OBLIGATION TO ACCOMMODATE A SHORTFALL OR EXCESS IN EARLIER YEARS THAT
RESULTS FROM THE VARIATION BETWEEN THE QUANTITY OF SRECS AND

SENATE BILL 341
SREC–IIS, CALCULATED FOR THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD
OBLIGATION AND THE QUANTITY OF SRECS AND SREC–IIS SOLD UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(III) ADJUSTS THE NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE FOR
PROJECTED AND PAST PURCHASE OBLIGATIONS.
(B) (1) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROCURE FROM THE ESCROW
ACCOUNT UNDER THIS SECTION THE NUMBER OF SRECS AND SREC–IIS TO
SATISFY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S OBLIGATIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND §
7–709.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE REQUIREMENT
ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION, IF THERE ARE INSUFFICIENT SRECS AND
SREC–IIS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AVAILABLE FOR PURCHASE, ANY OVERPAYMENT
SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED BACK TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY TO BE REFUNDED OR
CREDITED TO EACH CUSTOMER BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S CONSUMPTION OF
ELECTRICITY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO
STANDARD.
(3) THE CALCULATION OF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SREC AND
SREC–II PURCHASE OBLIGATIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR SRECS AND
SREC–IIS GENERATED BY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT BEGIN
OPERATION AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, SHALL BE BASED ON FINAL ELECTRICITY
SALES, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(4) ANY INTEREST EARNED IN THE ESCROW ACCOUNT SHALL REMAIN
IN THE ACCOUNT AND MAY NOT BE REDIRECTED TO ANY OTHER FUND.
(C) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE REQUIREMENT
ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION, COMPLIANCE FEES PAID INTO THE ESCROW
ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO ELECTRIC
COMPANIES TO PAY FOR FUTURE SRECS AND SREC–IIS PROCURED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
Article – Tax – General
8–404.
(a) Each public service company that, in a calendar year, has gross receipts
derived from business in the State or delivers electricity or natural gas for final
consumption in the State shall complete, under oath, and file with the Department a public
service company franchise tax return, on or before April 15th of the next year.

SENATE BILL 341 27
(b) (1) Each public service company that reasonably expects its public service
company franchise tax for a year to exceed $1,000 shall complete, under oath, and file with
the Department a declaration of estimated tax, on or before April 15 of that year.
(2) A public service company required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection to file a declaration of estimated tax for a taxable year shall complete and file
with the Department a quarterly estimated tax return on or before June 15, September 15,
and December 15 of that year.
(c) A public service company shall file with the return an attachment that states
any information that the Department requires to determine gross receipts derived from
business in the State or kilowatt hours or therms of natural gas delivered for final
consumption in the State.
(D) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY THAT IS ENGAGED IN THE TRANSMISSION,
DISTRIBUTION, OR DELIVERY OF ELECTRICITY IN THE STATE SHALL FILE WITH THE
RETURN THE GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM CUSTOMERS IN THE STATE THAT USE
MORE THAN 100 MEGAWATTS OF ELECTRICITY.
8–408.
The Department shall:
(1) administer the laws that relate to the public service company franchise
tax;
(2) adopt reasonable regulations to administer the provisions of laws that
relate to the public service company franchise tax;
(3) design the returns and forms that, on completion, provide the
information required for the administration of the public service company franchise tax
laws;
(4) collect the public service company franchise tax revenue, including
penalties and interest;
(5) ALLOCATE 75% OF THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY FRANCHISE
TAX REVENUES ATTRIBUTED TO CUSTOMERS THAT USE MORE THAN 100
MEGAWATTS OF ELECTRICITY THAT IS COLLECTED FROM PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANIES THAT ARE ENGAGED IN THE TRANSMISSION, DISTRIBUTION, OR
DELIVERY OF ELECTRICITY IN THE STATE TO THE ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 7–1235 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
(6) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (5) OF THIS SECTION, pay that
revenue into the General Fund of the State; and

SENATE BILL 341
[(6)] (7) certify to the Comptroller that revenue.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.